Utah statutes.
4-31-11.   Restrictions on movement of swine -- Swine feeder license -- Restrictions on feeding garbage to swine.

(1)  Except as provided by a rule of the department, a person may not move or allow swine to stray from:

(a)  a quarantine area established under this chapter; or

(b)  one area to another, if the swine are affected or exposed to hog cholera or swine plague.

(2) (a)  A person may not feed garbage to swine, unless he has a license issued by the department.

(b)  Application for a swine feeder license shall be made to the department upon forms prescribed and furnished by it.

(c)  Upon approval of the application and payment of a fee in an amount determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2), the department shall issue the applicant a swine feeder license valid through December 31 of the year issued.

(d)  A swine feeder license is annually renewable for a period of one year upon the payment of an annual license renewal fee in an amount determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).

(3)  A person may not feed swine garbage collected from any place unless it is:

(a)  heated to a temperature of at least 212 degrees Fahrenheit;

(b)  boiled for 30 minutes or more; or

(c)  subjected to another process as provided by rule by the department.

